Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3 Local License Requirements and Regulations for Manufacture, Distribution, and Sale

3-5-40.
Requirement by counties or municipalities of licenses for manufacture, distribution, and sale of malt beverages; effect of revocation of license issued by commissioner or by county or municipality upon license issued by other.

The businesses of manufacturing, distributing, and selling malt beverages at wholesale or retail shall not be conducted in any county or incorporated municipality of this state without a license from the governing authority of the county or municipality.

When any county or municipal license issued pursuant to this Code section is revoked by the governing authority of the county or municipality, any similar malt beverage license issued to the same person by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter shall automatically become invalid.

When any state malt beverage license issued pursuant to this chapter is revoked by the commissioner, any similar malt beverage license issued to the same person by any county or municipality shall automatically become invalid.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 15A; Ga. L. 1937, p. 148, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 14, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4301, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 41.

Law reviews.

For comment on Hornsby v. Allen, 326 F.2d 605 (5th Cir. 1964), see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 550 (1965).

3-5-41.
Requirement and issuance of county licenses generally.

If any business allowed under this chapter is proposed to be carried on within the unincorporated area of a county, the applicant for a license shall pay to the proper officer, to be designated by the governing authority of the county, an annual license fee as fixed by the governing authority. The license shall apply to and be required for each brewer or place of manufacture and also for each place of wholesale and retail distribution outside of any incorporated municipality.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 7; Code 1933, § 5A-4303, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 42.

3-5-42.
Requirement and issuance of municipal licenses generally; requirement by county of license for business licensed by municipality.

If any business allowed under this chapter is proposed to be carried on within the corporate limits of a municipality, the applicant for a license shall pay to the proper officer, to be designated by the governing authority of the municipality, an annual license fee as fixed by the governing authority. The license shall apply to and be required for each brewer or place of manufacture and also for each place of wholesale and retail distribution.

When any of the businesses described in this Code section are licensed by the municipal governing authority, no county license fee shall be required by the county governing authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 7; Code 1933, § 5A-4302, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-5-43.
Restriction on amount of license fee charged by county or municipality other than that of wholesale dealer’s principal place of business.

Where a wholesale dealer is licensed to do business in more than one municipality or county of this state, no municipality or county other than that of the wholesale dealer’s principal place of business shall charge a license fee exceeding $100.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 185, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-4304, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 43.

Cross references.

Exemption of certain salespeople and merchants from municipal taxes and license fees, §

48-5-354

.